Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 4

Jails and Jailers

41-4-101. Duty of sheriff — Appointment of jailer.

The sheriff of the county has, except in cases otherwise provided by law, the custody and charge of the jail of the county and of all prisoners committed to the jail and may appoint a jailer.

Code 1858, § 5400; Shan., § 7375; Code 1932, § 11984; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1101; Acts 2017, ch. 401, § 1.

Cross-References. Abatement of fire violations, § 68-120-109.

Corrections volunteer services, title 41, ch. 10.

Counselors at educational and correctional institutions, qualifications, § 8-50-105.

Duties of sheriff, title 8, ch. 8, part 2.

Failure to keep adequate jail indictable without prosecutor, § 40-13-104.

Fees of jailer, title 8, ch. 26.

Inmate labor for private purposes, §§ 4-6-138, 41-2-148, 41-3-106.

Jail as workhouse, § 41-2-102.

Liability for acts of deputies appointed by sheriff, title 8, ch. 8, part 3.

Prisoners who may apply for release during certain hours, § 41-2-128.

Removal and replacement of jail, §§ 5-7-111, 5-7-114.

Specifications for construction, § 5-7-110.

Submission of building plans, § 4-3-608.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Liability of State Officials and Prison Corporations for Excessive Use of Force Against Inmates of Private Prisons, 40 Vand. L. Rev. 983 (1987).

41-4-102. Delivery of jail and prisoners to successor in office.

Upon the resignation, death, removal from office or expiration of the term of office of any sheriff or coroner acting as sheriff, the jail and the prisoners in the jail, with everything belonging or pertaining thereto, shall be delivered over to the successor of the sheriff or coroner or any person duly authorized by law to take charge of the jail.

A failure to comply with this section, after demand made by the person entitled to the charge of the jail, is a misdemeanor.

Code 1858, §§ 5407, 5408 (deriv. Acts 1777 (Nov.), ch. 8, § 12); Shan., §§ 7385, 7386; Code 1932, §§ 11994, 11995; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1102.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in subsection (b) has been designated as Class A by authority of § 40-35-110, which provides that offenses designated misdemeanors without specification as to category are Class A. See also § 39-11-114.

Cross-References. Delivery of papers and property to successor, § 8-8-214.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

41-4-103. Persons confined — Evaluation authorized.

In addition to convicts sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail, the jail is used as a prison for the safekeeping or confinement of the following persons:

Persons committed for trial for public offenses;

Inmates sentenced to imprisonment in the penitentiary, until their removal to the penitentiary;

Persons committed for contempt or on civil process;

Persons committed on failure to give security for their appearance as witnesses in any criminal cases;

Persons charged with or convicted of a criminal offense against the United States;

Insane persons, pending transfer to a hospital for the insane or other disposition; and

All other persons committed to the jail by authority of law.

The jailer may perform evaluations of the persons listed in subdivisions (a)(1)-(7) for purposes of classification, management, care, control and cell assignment.

Code 1932, § 11980; Acts 1978, ch. 602, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1103.

Cross-References. Community-based screening process, pre-screening agents, § 33-6-104.

Confinement for short terms in felony cases, § 40-20-103.

Law Reviews.

The New Tennessee Code (Charles C. Trabue), 10 Tenn. L. Rev. 155 (1932).

Attorney General Opinions. County liability for cost of incarcerating misdemeanant before sentencing, OAG 98-159, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 159 (8/24/98).

A county jail must accept all arrested persons and may not refuse to take custody of an arrestee; however, a jail may make arrangements for medical treatment or transfer a prisoner to the nearest jail sufficient to care for the prisoner's medical needs if it cannot do so and may have the prisoner transferred to the nearest sufficient jail if it is over its approved capacity, OAG 02-015, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/6/02).

41-4-104. Inmates en route to penitentiary.

It is the duty of the jailer to receive and safely keep, without any fee therefor, all inmates on their way to the penitentiary, whenever the sheriff or other officer in charge of such inmates may deem it necessary.

Code 1858, § 5409; Shan., § 7387; Code 1932, § 11996; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1104.

41-4-105. Federal prisoners.

The jailer is liable for failing to receive and safely keep all persons delivered under the authority of the United States, to the like pains and penalties as for similar failures in the case of persons committed under authority of the state; however, the marshal or person delivering a prisoner under authority of the United States is liable to the jailer for fees and the subsistence of the prisoner while so confined, which shall be the same as provided by law for prisoners committed under authority of the state. The jailer will also collect from the marshal fifty cents (50¢) a month for each prisoner, under the resolution of the first congress, and pay the same to the county trustee forthwith, to be accounted for by the trustee as other county funds.

Code 1858, §§ 5397-5399 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2); Shan., §§ 7372-7374; Code 1932, §§ 11981-11983; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1105.

41-4-106. Filing of process.

The mittimus or process by which any prisoner is committed or discharged from jail, or an attested copy of the mittimus or process, shall be regularly filed in its order and safely kept by the sheriff, or jailer, under the sheriff's direction.

Code 1858, § 5401; Shan., § 7376; Code 1932, § 11985; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1106.

41-4-107. [Obsolete.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 41-4-107 (Acts 1927, ch. 4, § 1; Code 1932, § 12031; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1107), concerning persons sentenced to the county jail working out fines and costs, was deleted as obsolete in 1990.

41-4-108. Support of prisoners.

Every person committed to jail may furnish that person's own support, under such precautions as the jailer may deem proper to adopt for the purpose of guarding against escapes and to prevent the importation of intoxicants or narcotics. If such support is not furnished by the prisoner, it shall be furnished by the jailer.

Code 1858, § 5418; Shan., § 7429; mod. Code 1932, § 12038; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1108.

41-4-109. Food and bedding.

The jailer shall furnish adequate food and bedding.

Code 1858, § 5419 (deriv. Acts 1826, ch. 45, § 1); Shan., § 7430; mod. Code 1932, § 12039; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 12039; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1109; Acts 1996, ch. 703, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 3.

41-4-110. Segregation of sexes.

Male and female prisoners, except husband and wife, shall not be kept in the same cell or room in jail.

Code 1858, § 5423; Shan., § 7434; Code 1932, § 12042; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1110.

41-4-111. Cleanliness.

The jailers shall enforce cleanliness in their respective jails. They shall furnish the necessary apparatus for shaving once a week, shall provide bathing facilities separate for males and females, shall furnish hot and cold water, clean and sufficient bedding, and laundering once a week to those prisoners who are not able to provide such for themselves. The jailers shall keep the jails clean and shall remove all filth from each cell once every twenty-four (24) hours.

Code 1932, § 12040; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1111.

Cross-References. Sanitary inspections, § 4-3-1803.

Law Reviews.

The New Tennessee Code (Charles C. Trabue), 10 Tenn. L. Rev. 155 (1932).

41-4-112. Keys kept at jail.

It is the duty of the sheriff, where the jail is not fireproof, and so long as any person is confined in the jail, to be constantly at the jail or to have constantly at the jail someone having in possession all keys necessary to liberate all of the prisoners in the jail in case of fire.

Acts 1897, ch. 66, § 1; Shan., § 7440a1; Code 1932, § 12047; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1112.

41-4-113. Night duty.

The sheriff or other person shall remain in the jail every night from eight o'clock p.m. (8:00 p.m.) to six o'clock a.m. (6:00 a.m.).

Acts 1897, ch. 66, § 2; Shan., § 7440a2; Code 1932, § 12048; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1113.

41-4-114. Correspondence and visitors.

After examination and commitment of prisoners, the jailer shall convey letters from prisoners to their counsel and others, sealing and putting them in the post office if required. The jailer shall also admit, without charge, persons having business with prisoners and shall remain present at all interviews between prisoners and others, except their counsel.

Code 1858, § 5421 (deriv. Acts 1826, ch. 45, § 1); Shan., § 7432; Code 1932, § 12041; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1114.

41-4-115. Medical care of prisoners.

The county legislative bodies alone have the power, and it is their duty, to provide medical attendance for all prisoners confined in the jail in their respective counties. The county legislative bodies shall allow the county jail physician such compensation, to be paid by their respective counties, as may be fixed by the county legislative body agreed upon in writing between the county and the attending jail physician or as may be fixed by the county legislative body.

The state shall be liable for expenses incurred from emergency hospitalization and medical treatment rendered to any state prisoner incarcerated in a county jail or workhouse; provided, that the prisoner is admitted to the hospital. The sheriff of the county in which the state prisoner is incarcerated shall file a petition with the criminal court committing the state prisoner to the county jail or workhouse attaching to the petition a copy of the hospital bills of costs for the state prisoner. It is the duty of the court committing the state prisoner to the county jail or workhouse to examine bills of costs, and if the costs are proved, the court shall certify the fact thereon and forward a copy to the judicial cost accountant. The expenses for emergency hospitalization or medical treatment shall be paid in the same manner as court costs. Claims for incidents occurring after March 1, 1977, shall be reimbursed if otherwise authorized by this subsection (b).

The state shall be responsible for the transportation costs and cost of any guard necessary upon a state prisoner's admission to a hospital or required follow-up treatment. Reimbursement shall be made according to the procedures established by § 41-8-106, but shall be in addition to the per diem established in § 41-8-106.

Any county or municipality may, by resolution or ordinance adopted by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of its legislative body, establish and implement a plan authorizing the jail or workhouse administrator of the county or municipality to charge an inmate in the jail or workhouse a co-pay amount for any medical care, treatment, pharmacy services or substance abuse treatment by a licensed provider provided to the inmate by the county or municipality. The county or municipality adopting the co-pay plan shall establish the amount the inmate is required to pay for each service provided. Nothing in this subsection (d) shall be construed as authorizing a county or municipality to deny medical care, treatment, pharmacy services or substance abuse treatment by a licensed provider to an inmate who cannot pay the co-pay amount established by the plan.

If an inmate cannot pay the co-pay amount established by a plan adopted pursuant to subsection (d), the plan may authorize the jail or workhouse administrator to deduct the co-pay amount from the inmate's commissary account or any other account or fund established by or for the benefit of the inmate while incarcerated.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a plan established pursuant to subsection (d) may also authorize the jail or workhouse administrator to seek reimbursement for the expenses incurred in providing medical care, treatment, hospitalization or pharmacy services to an inmate incarcerated in the jail or workhouse from an insurance company, health care corporation, TennCare or other source, if the inmate is covered by an insurance policy, TennCare or subscribes to a health care corporation or other source for those expenses.

No claim against the state for payment of expenses under this section shall be paid unless the claim is submitted to the department of correction within six (6) months from the date the services were provided.

Acts 1877, ch. 160, § 1; 1885, ch. 95, § 5; Shan., § 7440; Code 1932, § 12046; Acts 1978, ch. 901, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1115; Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 56; 1996, ch. 850, § 1; 2004, ch. 695, § 1; 2014, ch. 582, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Care of workhouse prisoners by jail physician, § 41-2-118.

Earnings of inmates deposited in trust accounts, establishment and payment of daily room and board rate, § 41-21-511.

Regulation and care of inmates, title 41, ch. 21, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. A county jail must accept all arrested persons and may not refuse to take custody of an arrestee; however, a jail may make arrangements for medical treatment or transfer a prisoner to the nearest jail sufficient to care for the prisoner's medical needs if it cannot do so and may have the prisoner transferred to the nearest sufficient jail if it is over its approved capacity, OAG 02-015, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/6/02).

Medical treatment of prisoners in county facilities in the event of a bioterrorism attack, OAG 03-087, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 104 (7/10/03).

Payment of medical expenses of jail prisoners on medical furlough or bond, OAG 06-084 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 93 (5/5/06).

Inmate funds established by or for the benefit of the inmate while incarcerated and not collected for governmental or public purposes are private funds rather than public funds, OAG 06-156, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (10/9/06).

41-4-116. Jail inspectors.

The county legislative body may, at its January term each year, appoint three (3) householders or freeholders, residents of the county, of lawful age, to act as jail inspectors for the ensuing year, or the court may appoint inspectors at any other time to act for a shorter period.

The county mayor shall be an ex officio inspector of the jail in each county.

It is the duty of the inspectors appointed to:

Visit and examine the county jail at least once each month;

Make rules and regulations for the preservation of the health and decorum of the prisoners;

Decide all disputes between the jailer and the prisoners;

Provide for the restraint, by ironing or segregation of prisoners who offer violence to fellow prisoners or to the jailer or the jailer's assistants, or for attempting to break jail; and

Make a report, at each meeting of the county legislative body, of the state and condition of the prisoners and the jail.

Code 1858, §§ 5425-5427 (deriv. Acts 1826, ch. 45, § 2); Shan., §§ 7436-7438; mod. Code 1932, §§ 12043-12045; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-1116 — 41-1118; Acts 1984, ch. 652, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 477 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. County jail inspectors, OAG 99-153, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 155 (8/16/99).

Duties of jail inspectors, OAG 04-070, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (4/21/04).

41-4-117. Violation as misdemeanor.

A violation of any of the provisions of §§ 41-4-108 — 41-4-116, whether by the sheriff or by any person selected as jailer or guard by the sheriff, is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1897, ch. 66, § 3; Shan., § 7440a3; mod. Code 1932, § 12049; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1119; Acts 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Cross-References. Abatement of fire violations, § 68-120-109.

Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

41-4-118. Employment of guard.

In all cases where a defendant charged with the commission of a felony is committed to jail, either before or after trial, and the safety of the defendant or the defendant's safekeeping, requires a guard, it is the duty of the sheriff to employ a sufficient guard to protect the defendant from violence and to prevent the defendant's escape or rescue. Nothing in §§ 41-4-118 — 41-4-120 authorizes the employment of a guard in cases of insufficient jails, but in such cases the defendants shall be sent to adjoining counties, as required by law.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 28, § 1; Shan., § 7377; Code 1932, § 11986; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1120.

41-4-119. Compensation — Taxing of costs.

For service as a guard pursuant to § 41-4-118, each guard shall receive one dollar ($1.00) for each day, and one dollar ($1.00) for each night so necessarily employed, to be taxed in the bill of costs and paid as other costs are now paid.

Before the payments provided for in subsection (a) are allowed and taxed in the bill of costs, the sheriff shall, in each case, make a statement showing the names and number of the guards, the time of service and the amount due each. The district attorney general shall examine and certify the statement as correct. The circuit or criminal judge shall also examine the statement, and examine in open court such testimony as the judge may deem necessary as to the necessity of the guards, as to their service, and shall certify that the guards were necessary, and that they have rendered the service, and the cost is correctly taxed, all of which shall be spread on the records. Upon a certified copy being presented to the commissioner of finance and administration, the commissioner shall issue a warrant for the payment.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 28, § 2; Shan., § 7378; Code 1932, § 11987; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 24, 29; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1121.

Cross-References. Taxing of costs, §§ 40-24-102 — 40-24-106.

41-4-120. Board in guarding prisoner.

Whenever any officer has to pay necessary expenses for board in guarding a prisoner, the expenses shall be allowed to the officer, to be taxed in the bill of costs not to exceed thirty-five cents (35¢) per meal each for the officer, the prisoner and the guard.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 28, § 4; Shan., § 7379; mod. Code 1932, § 11988; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1122.

41-4-121. Safekeeping of prisoners — Sufficient jails.

The sheriff has the authority, when the jail of the county is insufficient for the safekeeping of a prisoner, to convey the prisoner to the nearest sufficient jail in the state or, if the prisoner is a juvenile, to the nearest sufficient juvenile detention facility in the state.

In all cases where it is shown to the committing court that the jail of the county in which the commitment should be made is insufficient for the safekeeping of the prisoner, the court may order commitment of the prisoner to the nearest sufficient county jail or, if the prisoner is a juvenile, to the nearest sufficient juvenile detention facility.

In all cases where the jail in which a prisoner is confined becomes insufficient for any cause, any circuit, criminal, or general sessions judge, upon the application of the sheriff and proof of the fact, may order the prisoner to be removed to the nearest sufficient jail or, if the prisoner is a juvenile, to the nearest sufficient juvenile detention facility.

An order issued under this section shall be reviewed by the issuing court at least once every thirty (30) days. In conducting the review, the court shall determine whether the order needs to remain in place, be terminated, or be modified to place conditions on the order. In evaluating whether the order needs to remain in place, the court shall consider the jail or juvenile detention facilities' obligations relative to the use of restrictive housing. If the order is terminated, the prisoner shall be returned to the county jail or juvenile detention facility, as appropriate.

Nothing in this section authorizes a non-adjudicated juvenile, or a non-adjudicated juvenile who has been transferred to criminal court in accordance with title 37, chapter 1, to be committed or removed to the state penitentiary or a branch prison for safekeeping.

Code 1858, §§ 5402-5404 (deriv. Acts 1809 (Sept.), ch. 126, § 4; 1817, ch. 17, § 1); Shan., §§ 7380-7382; Code 1932, §§ 11989-11991; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 41-1123 – 41-1125; Acts 2018, ch. 1045, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1045, § 3 provided that section 1 of the act, which amended this section by adding subsections (d) and (e), shall apply to juvenile prisoners committed or moved for safekeeping prior to, on, or after May 21, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 1045, § 3 provided that section 2 of the act, which amended this section, shall apply to prisoners committed or moved for safekeeping prior to, on, or after January 1, 2019.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 3.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Criminal Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 319 (1978).

Attorney General Opinions. A county jail must accept all arrested persons and may not refuse to take custody of an arrestee; however, a jail may make arrangements for medical treatment or transfer a prisoner to the nearest jail sufficient to care for the prisoner's medical needs if it cannot do so and may have the prisoner transferred to the nearest sufficient jail if it is over its approved capacity, OAG 02-015, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 16 (2/6/02).

41-4-122. Guard for removal of prisoner.

The sheriff is authorized to employ as many as two (2) persons, if necessary, in removing a prisoner under § 41-4-121, and each shall be allowed for such services as is provided for similar services in conveying inmates to the penitentiary.

Code 1858, § 5405 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 36, § 2); Shan., § 7383; Code 1932, § 11992; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1126.

Cross-References. Fees for guards, § 8-21-901.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 3.

41-4-123. Redelivery to place of trial.

The prisoner shall be delivered to the sheriff or deputy sheriff of the county from which the prisoner has been sent, on demand made immediately preceding or during the term at which the prisoner is triable.

Code 1858, § 5406; Shan., § 7384; Code 1932, § 11993; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1127.

41-4-124. Allowance of expenses.

When the court orders the prisoner to be carried to the jail of another county for safekeeping for want of a sufficient jail in the county where the case is pending, it may make a reasonable allowance to the sheriff and necessary guard, including expenses for conveying the prisoner to the jail so ordered by the judge.

Code 1858, § 5433 (deriv. Acts 1839-1840, ch. 103); Shan., § 7444; Code 1932, § 12052; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1128.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 3.

41-4-125. Proof of costs.

The jailer in cases specified in § 41-4-124 may prove costs in the circuit or criminal court of the county and obtain the certificate of the district attorney general of that court thereto. The clerk of the court shall forward the certificate to the court where the cause is pending to be taxed in the bill of costs.

Code 1858, § 5434; Shan., § 7445; Code 1932, § 12053; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1129.

41-4-126. Allowance for additional guards.

If the court directs the sheriff to summon more than two (2) guards in order to carry safely any prisoner charged with a crime from one county to another for trial or safekeeping, the commissioner of finance and administration shall allow the additional guards ordered by the court the same compensation that is allowed by law to the two (2) guards and give a warrant for that compensation to the sheriff.

Code 1858, § 5435 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 69, § 1); Shan., § 7446; Code 1932, § 12054; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 24, 29; C. Supp. 1950, § 12054; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1130.

Cross-References. Guarding of work parties, § 41-22-303.

Summons of additional guards, § 40-23-110.

Warrant to summon aid in removal of prisoners, § 40-23-109.

41-4-127. Transportation appropriations by counties having no jail.

The county legislative bodies of counties that have no jail may appropriate a contingent fund in an amount sufficient to pay all contingent expenses in transporting prisoners to and from jail, the appropriation to be made from time to time, so that the sheriff may be able, at any time, upon application to the county trustee, to procure the money necessary, for which the sheriff shall execute a receipt, showing the amount received, which receipt shall clearly set forth for which prisoner the money is expended.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 95, § 1; Shan., § 7388; Code 1932, § 11997; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1131.

41-4-128. Accounts of appropriated funds.

It is the duty of the county trustee to keep a book in which the trustee keeps an account showing the amounts appropriated from time to time, and also to keep a correct account of all moneys drawn by the sheriff from the contingent fund.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 95, § 2; Shan., § 7389; Code 1932, § 11998; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1132.

41-4-129. Accounts of sheriffs and jailers.

Sheriffs and jailers shall make written statements of account, properly proven and sworn to, for the keeping of prisoners, specifying distinctly each item and the amount due for each item.

Code 1858, § 5430 (deriv. Acts 1823, ch. 51, § 1); Shan., § 7441; mod. Code 1932, § 12050; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1133.

41-4-130. [Reserved.]

The fees of jailers shall be taxed separately from the general bills of costs of criminal cases.

All state costs shall be properly proved and sworn to before the clerk of the criminal or circuit court of the county and certified by the clerk for payment.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 7, § 2; Shan., § 7447a; Code 1932, § 12055; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 24, 29; C. Supp. 1950, § 12055; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1135; Acts 1983, ch. 418, § 1.

Cross-References. Jailers' fees, state subsidies, § 8-26-105.

Liability of state or county, § 40-25-129.

Reimbursement of jailer for keeping state prisoners, § 8-26-106.

Attorney General Opinions. County liability for cost of incarcerating misdemeanant before sentencing, OAG 98-0159, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 159 (8/24/98).

41-4-132. Sheriff's fees.

The accounts of sheriffs for keeping prisoners in their respective jails charged with crime, for which the state may eventually become liable, shall be certified; provided, that the sheriffs having such bills shall first make oath as to the correctness of the bills before the clerk of the circuit or criminal court, who shall affix the clerk's certificate to the bills.

Acts 1887, ch. 242, § 1; Shan., § 7448; Code 1932, § 12056; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 24, 29; C. Supp. 1950, § 12056; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; modified T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1136; Acts 1983, ch. 418, §§ 2, 3.

Cross-References. Cases in which state or county liable, § 40-25-129.

41-4-133. Filing of sheriff's bills.

The clerk of the court shall then file the bills of the sheriff, together with the affidavit of the sheriff, whose signature shall be certified in writing under seal of office as authentic by the clerk of the court on the face of the document, and then the sheriff or the clerk shall forward the bills to the proper authorities for payment.

Acts 1887, ch. 242, § 2; Shan., § 7449; Code 1932, § 12057; modified T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1137; Acts 1983, ch. 418, §§ 4, 5; 1997, ch. 113, § 1.

41-4-134. Compliance as prerequisite to payment.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall not issue warrants for any accounts of sheriffs for boarding prisoners until the bill shows on its face compliance with all of the requirements of §§ 41-4-131 — 41-4-133.

Acts 1887, ch. 242, § 3; Shan., § 7450; Code 1932, § 12058; impl. am. Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 24, 29; C. Supp. 1950, § 12058; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1138.

41-4-135. Refund to state of costs collected from defendant.

If costs are afterward collected from the defendant or the defendant's sureties, they shall be turned over to the state treasurer by the clerk of the court as fines are remitted.

Acts 1887, ch. 242, § 4; Shan., § 7451; Code 1932, § 12059; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1139.

41-4-136. Monthly audit of jailer's fees.

The jailer's fees for county prisoners shall be referred monthly to the county mayor for inspection, who shall audit the fees and cause the clerk to issue a warrant for the amount allowed.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 7, §§ 1, 3; Shan., § 7451a; mod. Code 1932, § 12060; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1140; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Prisons and Prisoners, § 3.

41-4-137. Refund to county of fees collected from defendant.

If, after the hearing of any case in any of the courts upon which the costs of jailer’s fees or any part of the jailer’s fees has been paid as provided in § 41-4-136, any of the sum is collected from the defendant, the sum collected shall be placed in the county treasury to reimburse the county.

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 7, § 5; Shan., § 7452; Code 1932, § 12061; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 41-1141.

41-4-138. Physical examination of prisoners.

The sheriff of each county who is charged with the care and custody of prisoners is empowered to hire a female registered nurse and a male registered nurse who are authorized to make complete physical examinations of all persons committed to the custody of the sheriff for the purpose of preventing the spread of any contagious disease. The physical examinations may include the taking of blood tests and Pap smear tests and any other tests that are approved and recommended by the county health officer.

All females committed to the custody of the sheriff are to be examined only by the female registered nurse hired for that purpose and all males committed to the custody of the sheriff are to be examined by the male nurse hired for that purpose.

Acts 1969, ch. 178, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., § 41-1142.

Attorney General Opinions. Mandatory medical testing of persons committed to jail, OAG 96-101, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (7/31/96).

Legality of segregating HIV/AIDS infected inmates in local jail, OAG 97-050, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 59 (4/16/97).

41-4-139. State prisoners — Payment to county or municipality for keeping.

Whenever the chief executive officer of any county penal farm certifies on or before the tenth day of each month to the judicial cost accountant the state prisoners kept in the institution and the number of days each was kept in the institution during the preceding month, the judicial cost accountant shall cause to be paid to the county the subsidy for that county as fixed by provisions of chapter 8 of this title and the contracts entered into pursuant thereto.

For the purposes of this section, “county penal farm” is construed to include city jails in those municipalities that have concurrent jurisdiction with general sessions courts over state misdemeanors. The municipality shall be compensated in the same manner and conditions as counties are compensated.

Acts 1970, ch. 520, § 1; 1972, ch. 534, § 1; 1976, ch. 828, § 1; 1977, ch. 404, § 4; T.C.A., § 41-1143; Acts 1984, ch. 896, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.